California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) After the refund process described in subdivision (b) is completed, any revenue from an unconstitutional or otherwise invalid tax described in subdivision (a) that is paid to the board shall be transmitted by the board to the district or its successor in accordance with Section 7271. However, unless the ordinance specifies otherwise, if at the time the board is making those transmittals the
 district that imposed the tax has no successor, or has disbanded, dissolved, or is otherwise no longer functioning, the board shall transmit those revenues in the following manner:

(1) If the tax levied by the district was imposed on a countywide basis, the revenues shall be transmitted to the county’s general fund.

(2) If the tax levied by the district was imposed on a citywide basis, the revenues shall be transmitted to the city’s general fund.

(3) If the tax levied by the district was imposed on a basis other than in paragraph (1) or (2), the revenues shall be transmitted to the general fund of each taxing jurisdiction located wholly within the district, based on each taxing jurisdiction’s proportionate share of revenue from taxes imposed pursuant to the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law allocated
 during the prior calendar year.

(d) The district, or any entity that participated in the formation of the district, shall reimburse the board for and hold the board harmless from any and all costs, losses, or refunds of any kind whatsoever, including preparatory costs incurred prior to implementation of the tax.

(e) In the case of any claim for refund of the transactions and use tax imposed by the San Francisco Educational Financing Authority, which was determined to be unconstitutional by the court in Hoogasian Flowers, Inc. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 23 Cal. App. 4th 1264, payment of any of those claims for refund shall be made from the revenues derived from the unconstitutional transactions and use tax collected by and in the possession of the board. When those funds and any other revenues derived from the unconstitutional tax still in the possession of the San Francisco
 Educational Financing Authority, the City and County of San Francisco, the San Francisco Unified School District, or the San Francisco Community College District are exhausted, any remaining payments of those claims for refund shall be paid from funds of the San Francisco Unified School District and the San Francisco Community College District which benefited from the illegal tax. The remaining payments shall be based on the method by which the San Francisco Educational Financing Authority distributed the proceeds of the tax to the San Francisco Unified School District and the San Francisco Community College District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7269.

The board may redistribute tax, penalty, or interest distributed to a district other than the district entitled thereto, but such redistribution shall not be made as to amounts originally distributed earlier than two quarterly periods prior to the quarterly period in which the board obtains knowledge of the improper distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Administration [7270. - 7274.]

7270.

(a) Prior to the operative date of any ordinance imposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to this part, the district shall contract with the board to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance. If the district has not contracted with the board prior to the operative date of its ordinance, it shall nevertheless so contract and, in that case, the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

(b) The contract shall contain a provision that the district shall reimburse the board for and hold the board harmless from any and all costs, losses, or refunds of any kind whatsoever.

(c) The contract shall also contain a provision that, in the event that a legal action is commenced challenging the validity of the tax in its entirety, as opposed to its application to an individual taxpayer, the district shall place the tax proceeds into an interest-bearing escrow account until the legality of the tax is finally resolved by a final and nonappealable decision rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction. That provision shall be enforceable by any interested person in a proceeding for a writ of mandate.

(d) The district shall be entitled to indemnity for any and all costs, losses, or refunds from any entity, except the
 state, that participated in the imposition of the tax. For the purposes of this part, “participated” means any involvement in procuring the legislation that authorized the tax, or in enacting or administering the ordinance imposing the tax. Any organization that is a member of the legislative body of the district imposing the tax has participated in the imposition of the tax within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7270.5.

Any action or proceeding filed on the basis that a tax ordinance provided for in this part or Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280) or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied on the basis that the tax ordinance is unconstitutional or otherwise invalid and filed for the sole purpose of contesting the validity of the district transactions and use tax, shall be commenced pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The state
 shall not be made a party to the action or proceeding. That action shall not be filed more than 60 days after the approval of the enabling ordinance by the voters unless the authorizing legislation specifies a longer period. If no action is filed within that period, the tax, the bonds, and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and uncontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 495, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7271.

All transactions and use taxes collected by the board pursuant to contract with the district shall be transmitted by the board to the district periodically as promptly as feasible. The transmittals shall be made at least twice in each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

7271.1.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Quarterly taxes” means the total amount of transactions and use taxes transmitted by the board to a district for a calendar quarter.

(2) “Refund” means the amount of transactions and use taxes deducted by the board from a district’s quarterly taxes in order to pay the district’s share of a transactions and use tax refund due to one taxpayer.

(3) “Offset portion” means that portion of the refund which
 exceeds the greater of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or 20 percent of the district’s quarterly taxes.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the board has deducted a refund from a district’s quarterly taxes which includes an offset portion, then the following provisions apply:

(1) Within three months after the board has deducted an offset portion, the district may request the board to transmit the offset portion to the district.

(2) As promptly as feasible after the board receives the district’s request, the board shall transmit to the district the offset portion as part of the board’s periodic transmittal of transactions and use taxes.

(3) The board shall thereafter deduct a pro rata share of the offset portion from future transmittals of
 transactions and use taxes to the district over a period to be determined by the board, but not less than two calendar quarters and not more than eight calendar quarters, until the entire amount of the offset portion has been deducted.

(c) The board shall not transmit the offset portion of the refund to the district if that transmittal would reduce or delay either the board’s payment of the refund to the taxpayer or the board’s periodic transmittals of transactions and use taxes to other districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7272.

The district shall pay to the board its costs of preparation to administer and operate the transactions and use taxes ordinance. The district shall pay such costs monthly as incurred and billed by the board. Such costs include all preparatory costs, including costs of developing procedures, programming for data processing, developing and adopting appropriate regulations, designing and printing of forms, developing instructions for the board’s staff and for taxpayers, and other necessary preparatory costs which shall include the board’s direct and indirect costs as specified by Section 11256 of the Government Code. Any disputes as to the amount of
 preparatory costs incurred shall be resolved by the Director of Finance, and his or her decision shall be final. The maximum amount of all preparatory costs to be paid by the district shall not, in any event, exceed one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 337, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

7273.

In addition to the amounts otherwise provided for preparatory costs, the board shall charge each district an amount for the board’s services in administering the transactions and use tax determined by the board, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, as follows:

(a) Beginning with the 2006–07 fiscal year, the amount charged all districts shall be based on the methodology described in Alternative 4C of the November 2004 report by the State Board of Equalization entitled “Response to the
 Supplemental Report of the 2004 Budget Act.” The amount charged each district shall be based upon the district’s proportional share of the revenue after weighting the revenue to equalize the differences in district tax rates.

(1) The amount charged each district may be adjusted in the current fiscal year to reflect the difference between the board’s budgeted costs and any significant revised estimate of costs. Any adjustment shall be subject to budgetary controls included in the Budget Act. Prior to any adjustment, the Department of Finance shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee not later than 30 days prior to the effective date of the adjustment.

(2) The amount charged each district shall be adjusted to reflect the difference between the board’s recovered costs and the actual costs incurred by the board during the fiscal year two years prior.

(b) The board shall, by June 1 of each year, notify districts of the amount that it anticipates will be assessed for the next fiscal year. The districts shall be notified of the actual amounts that will be assessed within 30 days after enactment of the Budget Act for that fiscal year.

(c) The amount charged a district that becomes operative during the fiscal year shall be estimated for that fiscal year based on weighted revenue.

(d) The amounts determined by subdivision (a) shall be deducted in equal amounts from the quarterly allocation of taxes collected by the board for a given district.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for the 2008–09 fiscal year to the 2014–15 fiscal year, inclusive, the amounts determined by subdivision (a)
 shall not include any revenues collected pursuant to Sections 6051.7 and 6201.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 31.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7273.2.

The board shall annually prepare a report showing the amount of both reimbursed and unreimbursed costs incurred by it in administering transactions and use taxes imposed by districts pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 786, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

7274.

The board shall make available to all licensed vehicle, vessel, and aircraft dealers who hold seller’s permits in this state information concerning the cities and counties located within districts which impose transactions and use tax ordinances and the applicable tax rates in those cities and counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 308, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Refunds of Unconstitutional Taxes [7275. - 7279.6.]

7275.

(a) Where a tax levied in a county in conformity with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) has been determined to be unconstitutional in a final and nonappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction and the revenues derived from that unconstitutional tax are paid to the board and held in an impound account, the board shall administer refunds and reimbursements of those illegally collected taxes in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after the effective date of the act adding this chapter, the procedures for refund or reimbursement of unconstitutional taxes contained in this chapter constitute the sole remedies for refund or reimbursement of illegal taxes as described in subdivision (a).

(2) Claims for refund of illegally collected taxes as described in subdivision (a) that were filed prior to the effective date of the act adding this chapter that have not been paid before that date shall be processed and paid to purchasers in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, regardless of whether the purchaser or the retailer filed the claim. Nothing in the act adding this chapter shall be construed to require refiling of those previously filed claims for refund.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6902, the period of limitations
 specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7277 shall apply to any claims for refund that are payable from any revenues paid to the board and held in an impound account which are derived from the unconstitutional tax.

(d) No later than 10 days from the date the decision determining the contested tax to be unconstitutional is final and nonappealable, the court shall order the entity that levied the unconstitutional tax to pay the impounded revenues to the board which shall immediately deposit them in a segregated impound account in the Retail Sales Tax Fund. The moneys so deposited, together with any interest thereon, shall be used as follows:

(1) To satisfy in full all valid claims for refund filed prior to the effective date of the act adding this chapter, in amounts as verified by audit of the records of the board.

(2) To fund a reserve account, in an amount to be determined by the board, with the approval of the Department of Finance, to fund refund and reimbursement of moneys from illegally collected taxes as described in subdivision (a), liability for which arises out of audit assessments occurring after the date of the act adding this chapter.

(A) Moneys derived from the unconstitutional tax described in subdivision (a) received by the board after the date the board receives the impounded revenues as provided in subdivision (d) shall be deposited in the reserve account provided by this subdivision.

(B) This reserve account shall be maintained for 10 years from the date the board deposits the revenues in the segregated account in the Retail Sales Tax Fund provided by this subdivision.

(i) Any amount deposited in the reserve account shall be used to pay other refunds or reimbursements to taxpayers within 12 months of deposit. Amounts not used for refunds or reimbursements within 12 months of deposit shall be transferred to the county in which the unconstitutional tax was levied for deposit in that county’s general fund.

(ii) Upon termination of the 10-year period, any moneys remaining in this segregated account shall be transferred to the county in which the unconstitutional tax was levied for deposit in that county’s general fund.

(3) To satisfy valid claims for refund filed after the effective date of the act adding this chapter as described in Section 7277.

(4) To reimburse the board’s actual and reasonable costs of administering the
 refunds and reimbursements provided in this chapter, as approved by the Department of Finance.

(5) To reimburse losses resulting from the tax credit provided by Section 7276. In reimbursing those losses, the board may use its best estimates, based on historical allocation information, as to the amount of those losses. Any entity receiving the impounded moneys rather than the taxes being credited shall suffer no impairment of revenues and the timing and receipt as well as the amount of revenues shall not be adversely affected by the credit. Any security arrangement that the board has with any entity receiving impounded moneys, including, but not limited to, provisions requiring the transfer of revenues to a bond trustee, shall remain in full force and effect during the period of the credit, and any pledge of tax revenues shall apply with equal force and effect to the impounded moneys distributed to those entities by the board in lieu of the
 credited tax revenues, without any further action required by the entity of the board.

(e) Any impounded moneys subject to refund or reimbursement pursuant to this chapter that are not used for that purpose or not deposited in the reserve account described in subdivision (d) shall be transmitted to the county in which the unconstitutional tax was levied for deposit in that county’s general fund.

(f) For the purposes of bringing an action against the board for recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment of unconstitutional taxes as described in subdivision (a), the six-month period provided in Section 6934 shall not commence until the one-year claim period provided by Section 7277 has expired pursuant to the terms of this chapter. Suits for refund shall be brought in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 6931) of Chapter
 7 of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7276.

Any taxpayers located in the jurisdiction in which an unconstitutional tax as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7275 was levied may claim a credit against their total amount of state and county sales or use tax as follows:

(a) An eligible taxpayer shall report sales and use taxes at the rates lawfully in effect in the county but may claim a credit against the total amount of state and local taxes, under rules to be promulgated by the board, in the amount of 0.75 percent. For the purpose of this
 section, “eligible taxpayer” means any person who resides in, or whose place of business is located in, the county in which the unconstitutional tax as described in subdivision (a) of Section 7275 was imposed, and who is required to report and pay sales tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6051) of Part 1 and any person required to report and pay or report and collect use tax under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 6201) of Part 1.

(b) An eligible taxpayer who claims the credit provided in subdivision (a) shall remit to the board all reported tax moneys except those which represent the amount of the credit. Amounts reported, but not remitted under subdivision (a), shall be deemed to have been paid in full. Amounts not reported shall remain subject to assessment under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451) of Part 1. The portion of those assessments representing this tax credit shall be paid from the reserve account provided by
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 7275.

(c) A taxpayer may not collect sales tax reimbursement pursuant to Section 1656.1 of the Civil Code nor use tax in an amount in excess of the amount required to be reported under subdivision (b) less amounts subject to credit under subdivision (a) during the period for which a credit is allowed. A receipt for use tax issued pursuant to Section 6202 in the amount of tax actually remitted to the board under subdivision (b) shall be sufficient to relieve the purchaser for further liability for the tax computed at the reporting rate.

(d) The tax credit provided by subdivision (a) may be claimed upon notice to eligible taxpayers by the board. That notice shall provide that the credit may be claimed commencing with those taxes due on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after the effective date of the
 act adding this section or after the court decision described in paragraph (a) of Section 7275 becomes final and unappealable, whichever occurs later.

(e) The tax credit shall continue until the board determines that the amount of impounded revenues held by the board and available to fund the revenue losses that result from the tax credit is insufficient to fund the tax credit for another full calendar quarter. Eligible taxpayers shall continue to take the credit on their returns until notified by the board that the credit is terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7277.

(a) In the event that any tax collected under this part is determined on the basis of Section 4 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution to be unconstitutional in a final and nonappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, and the revenues derived from the unconstitutional tax are held by the board in an impound account, a person who has reimbursed a retailer for that payment of that tax or a person, other than in a capacity as a retailer, who has paid that tax may file with the board a claim for
 refund of the unconstitutional tax in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The claim for refund shall be in writing, shall state the specific ground upon which the claim is founded, and shall be accompanied by proof of payment of the tax to a retailer or wholesaler, including, but not limited to, a copy of an invoice, bill of sale, or purchase contract, that indicates the following:

(A) The date upon which, and place at which, the purchase occurred.

(B) A description of the property purchased.

(C) The price paid for the property.

(D) The amount of the transactions and use tax collected with respect to the purchase, or
 if that amount is not separately stated, the amount of the purchase and the rate of tax from which the amount of transactions and use tax may be calculated.

(2) In the case of a purchaser that has self-reported use tax to the state, the claim for refund shall also indicate the amount of use tax paid and the period for which those taxes were remitted.

(3) (A) Only a claim for refund made with respect to a single purchase or aggregate purchases of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more shall be eligible for refund pursuant to this section.

(B) A claim for refund shall be filed within one year of the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing after the effective date of this section or after the date upon which the court decision described in subdivision (a) becomes final and nonappealable,
 whichever occurs later. If that one-year period does not end on the last day of a calendar quarter, it shall end on the last day of the preceding calendar quarter or on the last day of the calendar quarter which is nearest to the date the one-year period ends.

(c) For purposes of this section, “purchaser” means any person or entity, other than in a capacity as a retailer, who purchased tangible personal property the sale or use of which was subject to the unconstitutional tax described in subdivision (a).

(d) Interest shall be paid on the refunds provided by this chapter pursuant to Section 6907.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7279.

(a) The total amount of refunds paid under this chapter shall be the amount of the impounded revenues derived from the unconstitutional tax plus any interest earned on that amount that remains after valid claims for refund filed prior to the effective date of the act adding this chapter are paid and the reserve amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 7275 is established.

(b) The board’s actual and reasonable costs of administering refunds in accordance
 with this section and Section 7277, as approved by the Department of Finance, may be paid from the amount that is set aside for refunds under this chapter and may be paid prior to the payment of any claim for refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7279.5.

A copy of the provisions of this chapter may be filed by the board with the court to demonstrate that implementation of the proposed plan of reimbursement, refund, or credit in accordance with the provisions of this chapter complies with any orders of the court requiring implementation of a refund plan by the board. Judicial notice of this chapter shall be taken by the court. In rendering a decision that the provisions of this chapter comply with any order of the court, the court shall order that any attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the parties for the
 benefit of the persons seeking a refund be paid from the revenues collected pursuant to that tax plus any interest earned thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7279.6.

An arbitrary and capricious action of the board in implementing the provisions of this chapter shall be reviewable by writ.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1060, Sec. 2.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.7. ADDITIONAL LOCAL TAXES [7280. - 7300.6.]



  CHAPTER 1. Occupancy Taxes [7280. - 7283.51.]

7280.

(a) The legislative body of any city, county, or city and county may levy a tax on the privilege of occupying a room or rooms, or other living space, in a hotel, inn, tourist home or house, motel, or other lodging unless the occupancy is for a period of more than 30 days. The tax, when levied by the legislative body of a county, applies only to the unincorporated areas of the county.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “the privilege of occupying a room or rooms, or
 other living space, in a hotel, inn, tourist home or house, motel, or other lodging” does not include the right of an owner of a time-share estate in a room or rooms in a time-share project, or the owner of a membership camping contract in a camping site at a campground, or the guest of the owner, to occupy the room, rooms, camping site, or other real property in which the owner retains that interest.

For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) “Time-share estate” means a time-share estate, as defined by paragraph (1) of subdivision (x) of Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Membership camping contract” means a right or license as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 1812.300 of the Civil Code.

(3) “Guest of that owner” means a person who does either of the
 following:

(A) Occupies real property accompanied by the owner of either of the following:

(i) A time-share estate in that real property.

(ii) A camping site in a campground pursuant to a right or license under a membership camping contract.

(B) Exercises that owner’s right of occupancy without payment of any compensation to the owner.

(C) “Guest of that owner” specifically includes a person occupying a time-share unit or a camping site in a campground pursuant to any form of exchange program.

(c) For purposes of this section, “other lodging” includes, but is not limited to, a camping site or a space at a campground or
 recreational vehicle park, but does not include any of the following:

(1) Any facilities operated by a local government entity.

(2) Any lodging excluded pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) Any campsite excluded from taxation pursuant to Section 7282.

(d) Subdivision (b) does not affect or apply to the authority of any city, county, or city and county to collect a transient occupancy tax from time-share projects that were in existence as of May 1, 1985, and which time-share projects were then subject to a transient occupancy tax imposed by an ordinance duly enacted prior to May 1, 1985, pursuant to this section. Chapter 257 of the Statutes of 1985 may not be construed to affect any litigation pending on or prior to December 31, 1985.

(e) (1) (A) If the legislative body of a city, county, or city and county elects to exempt from a tax imposed pursuant to this section any of the following persons whose occupancy is for the official business of their employers, the legislative body shall create a standard form to claim this exemption and the officer or employee claiming the exemption shall sign the form under penalty of perjury:

(i) An employee or officer of a government outside the United States.

(ii) An employee or officer of the United States government.

(iii) An employee or officer of the state government or of the government of a political subdivision of the state.

(B) The
 standard form described in subparagraph (A) shall contain a requirement that the employee or officer claiming the exemption provide to the property owner one of the following, as determined by the legislative body of the city, county, or city and county imposing the tax, as conclusive evidence that his or her occupancy is for the official business of his or her employer:

(i) Travel orders from his or her government employer.

(ii) A government warrant issued by his or her employer to pay for the occupancy.

(iii) A government credit card issued by his or her employer to pay for the occupancy.

(C) The standard form described in subparagraph (A) shall contain a requirement that the officer or employee provide photo identification, proof of his or her
 governmental employment as an employee or officer as described in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of subparagraph (A), and proof, consistent with the provisions of subparagraph (B), that his or her occupancy is for the official business of his or her governmental employer.

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a property owner is not liable for the tax imposed pursuant to this section with respect to any government employee or officer described in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) for whom the property owner retains a signed and dated copy of a standard form that complies with the provisions of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1).

(f) The provisions of subdivision (e) are not intended to preclude a city, county, or city and county from electing to exempt any other class of persons from the tax imposed pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7280.5.

(a) The redevelopment agency of any city which has levied a transient occupancy tax pursuant to Section 7280 or 7281 may also, by ordinance, levy a transient occupancy tax in accordance with this part, if the city’s ordinance entitles any person subject to a transient occupancy tax under the city’s ordinance to credit the amount of transient occupancy taxes due to the redevelopment agency of that city pursuant to this section against the payment of taxes due under the city’s ordinance.

(b) An ordinance of a redevelopment agency imposing a
 transient occupancy tax pursuant to this section shall contain an enacting clause which states as follows:

“The redevelopment agency of the City of ____ does ordain as follows:”

The ordinance shall be signed by the chairperson of the agency and attested by the clerk or secretary of the agency, and shall take effect immediately upon its final passage, but shall become operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 180 days after adoption of the ordinance. In all other respects, the ordinance shall be introduced and passed, and notice given by publication, in the manner provided by law for general law cities.

(c) Any redevelopment agency adopting an ordinance pursuant to this section shall not levy a transient occupancy tax in excess of the rate of transient occupancy tax levied by its city, and the tax shall be levied only on
 accommodations located in a redevelopment project area for which the taxes are pledged pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 33641 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Any pledge pursuant to Section 33641 of the Health and Safety Code made with respect to taxes imposed under this section for the payment of principal and interest on bonds of a redevelopment agency shall constitute the obligation of a contract between the redevelopment agency and the holder of the bonds and shall be protected from impairment by the United States and California Constitutions. The provisions of this section which authorize the imposition of the taxes may not be repealed during the time that any of the bonds remain outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 665, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

7281.

The legislative body of any city or county may levy a tax on the privilege of renting a mobilehome, as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code, which is located outside a mobilehome park for occupancy on a transient basis unless such occupancy is for any period of more than 30 days. Such tax when levied by the legislative body of a county shall apply only to the unincorporated areas of the county.

This section does not authorize any city or county to levy a tax on the privilege of renting any mobilehome when the tenant is an employee of the owner or operator of the mobilehome.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7282.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no city, county, or city and county may levy a tax on the privilege of occupying a campsite in a unit of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 529, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

7282.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no city, county, or city and county may levy a tax under Section 7280 on any amount subject to tax under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001)) with respect to the sale of food products.

(b) This section shall also apply to charter cities.

(c) For purposes of this section, “food products” means food and beverage products of every kind,
 regardless of how or where served, and shall specifically include, but not be limited to, alcoholic beverages and carbonated beverages of every kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 940, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7283.

A board of supervisors may, by ordinance or resolution, establish procedures for the collection of delinquent amounts of any tax levied pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1187, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7283.5.

(a) (1) A purchaser, transferee, or other person or entity attempting to obtain ownership of a property, the owner of which is required to collect the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter, may request the city, county, or city and county in which that property is located to issue a tax clearance certificate under this section.

(2) A city, county, or city and county that issues a tax clearance certificate under this section may charge an administrative fee
 to cover its costs in issuing the certificate.

(b) Within 90 days of receiving a request described in subdivision (a), a city, county, or city and county shall do either of the following:

(1) Issue the tax clearance certificate.

(2) (A) Request the current owner of the property to make available that owner’s transient occupancy tax records for the purpose of conducting an audit regarding transient occupancy taxes that may be due and owing from the owner of the property.

(B) (i) Complete the audit described in subparagraph (A) on or before 90 days after the date that the current or former owner’s records are made available to the auditing jurisdiction and issue a tax clearance certificate within 30 days of
 completing the audit.

(ii) If, after completing the audit, the city, county, or city and county makes a determination that the current owner’s records are insufficient to make a determination of whether transient occupancy taxes may be due and owing, the city, county, or city and county is not required to issue a tax clearance certificate as otherwise required by this subdivision. The city, county, or city and county shall, within 30 days of making that determination, notify the purchaser, transferee, or other person or entity that made the request that it will not issue a tax clearance certificate due to the insufficiency of the prior owner’s records.

(c) If a city, county, or city and county does not comply with subdivision (b), the purchaser, transferee, or other person or entity that obtains ownership of the property shall not be liable for any transient occupancy tax
 obligations incurred prior to the purchase or transfer of the property.

(d) For a tax clearance certificate issued under this section, all of the following apply:

(1) The certificate shall state the amount of tax due and owing for the subject property, if any.

(2) The certificate shall state the period of time for which it is valid.

(3) The purchaser, transferee, or other person or entity who obtains ownership of the property may rely upon the tax clearance certificate as conclusive evidence of the tax liability associated with the property as of the date specified on the certificate.

(e) Any purchaser, transferee, or other person or entity described in subdivision (a) who does not obtain
 a tax clearance certificate under this section, or who obtains a tax clearance certificate that indicates that tax is due and fails to withhold, for the benefit of the city, county, or city and county, sufficient funds in the escrow account for the purchase of the property to satisfy the transient occupancy tax liability, shall be held liable for the amount of tax due and owing on the property.

(f) This section may not be construed to relieve a property owner of transient occupancy tax obligations incurred when that owner owned the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 936, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7283.51.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except in the case of fraud or the failure of a property owner to file a transient occupancy tax return, a city, county, or city and county may institute an action to collect unpaid transient occupancy taxes within four years of the date on which the transient occupancy taxes were required to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 936, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Local Agency Levy Powers And Limitations [7284. - 7284.7.]

7284.
